da: Sprinklerform: Juletræ; Sky; Konisk; Terning; Cylinder; Hjerte; Hexagonal; Ottekantet; Oval; Rektangulær; Rund; Kugleformet; Firkant; Stjerne; Trekantet; V-formet; Andet
sk-SK: Tvar postrekovača: Vianočný stromček; Oblak; Kónický; Kocka; Valec; Srdcový; Šesťhranný; Osemhranný; Oválny; Obdĺžnikový; Okrúhly; Sférický; Hranatý; Hviezda; Trojuholníkový; V tvare V; Iné
hr-HR: Oblik prskalica: Božićno drvce; Oblak; Konusni; Kocka; Cilindar; Srce; Šesterokutni; Osmerokutni; Ovalni; Pravokutni; Okrugli; Sferni; Kvadratni; Zvijezda; Trokutasti; U obliku slova V; Ostalo
it: Forma dell’irrigatore: Albero di Natale; Nuvola; Conico; Cubo; Cilindro; Cuore; Esagonale; Ottagonale; Ovale; Rettangolare; Rotondo; Sferica; Quadrato; Stella; Triangolare; A forma di V; Altro
th: รูปร่างสปริงเกอร์: ต้นคริสต์มาส; เมฆ; ทรงกรวย; คิวบ์; กระบอก; หัวใจ; แบบหกเหลี่ยม; แบบแปดเหลี่ยม; รูปไข่; แบบสี่เหลี่ยมผืนผ้า; ทรงกลม; ทรงกลม; ทรงเหลี่ยม; ดาว; แนวสามเหลี่ยม; รูปตัว V; อื่นๆ
fr: Forme de l’extincteur automatique à eau: Sapin de Noël; Nuage; Conique; Cube; Cylindre; Cœur; Hexagonal; Octogonal; Oval; Rectangulaire; Rond; Sphérique; Carré; Étoile; Triangulaire; En forme de V; Autre
ro-RO: Formă stropitoare: Brad de Crăciun; Nor; Conică; Cub; Cilindru; Inimă; Hexagonală; Octogonală; Ovală; Dreptunghiulară; Rotundă; Sferică; Pătrat; Stea; Triunghiulară; În formă de V; Altele
cs: Tvar postřikovače: Vánoční stromek; Mrak; Kónický; Krychle; Válec; Srdce; Šestiúhelník; Osmiúhelníkový; Oválný; Obdélníkový; Oválná; Sférický; Čtvercová; Hvězda; Trojúhelníkový; Ve tvaru písmene V; Jiné
pt-PT: Formato de aspersor: Árvore de Natal; Nuvem; Cónico; Cubo; Cilindro; Coração; Hexagonal; Octogonal; Oval; Retangular; Redondo; Esférico; Quadrado; Estrela; Triangular; Em forma de V; Outro
de: Sprinklerform: Weihnachtsbaum; Wolke; Konisch; Würfel; Zylinder; Herz; Sechseckig; Achteckig; Oval; Rechteckig; Rund; Sphärisch; Quadrat; Stern; Dreieckig; V-förmig; Sonstiges
pl: Kształt zraszacza: Choinka; Chmura; Stożkowaty; Sześcian; Cylinder; Serce; Sześciokątna; Ośmiokątny; Owalny; Prostokątna; Runda; Sferyczny; Kwadrat; Gwiazda; Trójkątny; V-kształtny; Inne
lt-LT: Purkštuvo forma: Kalėdinė eglutė; Debesis; Kūgis; Dėžė; Cilindrinis; Širdelių forma; Šešiakampis; Aštuonkampis; Ovalas; Stačiakampis; Apvalus; Sferinis; Kvadratas; Žvaigždė; Trikampis; V formos; Kita
ja: スプリンクラーの形状: クリスマスツリー; 雲; 円錐形; キューブ; 円筒形; ハート; 六角; 八角形; 楕円形; 長方形; ラウンド; 球状; スクエア; 星; 三角形; V型; その他
fi: Sadettimen muoto: Joulukuusi; Pilvi; Kartiomainen; Kuutio; Sylinteri; Sydän; Kuusikulmainen; Kahdeksankulmainen; Soikea; Suorakulmainen; Pyöreä; Pallomainen; Neliömäinen; Tähti; Kolmion muotoinen; V-muotoillut; Muu
ko: 스프링클러 모양: 크리스마스 트리; 구름; 코니컬; 큐브; 실린더; 하트; 육방정계; 팔각형의; 타원형; 직사각형; 라운드; 구의; 스퀘어; 별; 삼각형; V자형; 기타
el: Σχήμα ψεκαστήρα: Χριστουγεννιάτικο δέντρο; Σύννεφο; Κωνικός; Κουτί; Με κυλινδρικό δοχείο; Καρδιά; Εξαγώνιος; Οκταγωνικός; Οβάλ; Ορθογώνιο; Στρογγυλό; Σφαιρικό; Τετράγωνο; Αστέρι; Τριγωνική; Σε σχήμα V; Άλλο
bg-BG: Форма на пръскачка: Коледна елха; Облак; Конична; Куб; Цилиндър; Сърце; Шестоъгълна; Осмоъгълна; Овална; Правоъгълна; Кръгла; Сферична; Квадратна; Звезда; Триъгълна; V-образна; Други
vi: Hình dạng vòi phun nước: Cây thông giáng sinh; Đám mây; Hình nón; Khối lập phương; Hình trụ; Trái tim; Lục phương; Bát giác; Hình trái xoan; Chữ nhật; Mũi giày tròn; Hình cầu; Mũi giày vuông; Ngôi sao; Tam giác; Hình chữ V; Khác
hu: Locsoló formája: Karácsonyfa; Felhő; Kúp; Kocka; Tartályos; Szív; Hatszögletű; Nyolcszögű; Ovális; Téglalap; Kerek; Gömbölyű; Négyzet; Csillag; Háromszögletű; V alakú; Egyéb
es: Forma del aspersor: Árbol de Navidad; Nube; Cónico; Cubo; Cilindro; Corazón; Hexagonal; Octagonal; Ovalado; Rectangular; Redondo; Esférico; Cuadrado; Estrella; Triangular; En forma de V; Otros
sv: Sprinklerform: Julgran; Moln; Konisk; Kub; Cylinder; Hjärta; Hexagonal; Oktagonal; Oval; Rektangulär; Rund; Sfärisk; Fyrkantig; Stjärna; Triangulär; V-formad; Övrigt
ru: Форма разбрызгивателя: Рождественская елка; Облако; Конический; Куб; Цилиндр; Сердце; Шестиугольный; Восьмиугольный; Овальный; Прямоугольный; Круглый; Сферический; Квадратный; Звезда; Треугольный; V-образный; Другое
nl: Vorm sprinkler: Kerstboom; Wolk; Conisch; Kubus; Cilinder; Hart; Zeshoekig; Achthoekig; Ovaal; Rechthoekig; Rond; Sferisch; Vierkant; Ster; Driehoekig; V-vormig; Andere
tr: Yağmurlama şekli: Noel ağacı; Bulut; Konik; Küp; Silindir; Kalp; Altıgen şeklinde; Sekizgen şeklinde; Oval; Dikdörtgen; Yuvarlak; Kürese; Kare; Yıldız; Üçgen şekilli; V şekilli; Diğer
zh-CN: 喷洒器形状: 圣诞树游戏; 云朵; 锥形; 立方体; 圆柱; 心; 六角形; 八角形; 椭圆形; 矩形; 圆头; 球形; 方形; 星型; 三角形; V 型; 其他
sl-SI: Oblika škropilnika: Božično drevo; Oblak; Stožec; Kocka; Cilinder; Srce; Šestkotna; Osemkotna; Ovalna; Pravokotna; Okrogla; Krogla; Kvadrat; Zvezda; Trikotnik; V obliki črke V; Drugo
en: Sprinkler shape: Christmas tree; Cloud; Conical; Cube; Cylinder; Heart; Hexagonal; Octagonal; Oval; Rectangular; Round; Spheric; Square; Star; Triangular; V-shaped; Other
nb: Sprinklerform: Juletre; Sky; Konisk; Kube; Sylinder; Hjerte; Heksagonal; Oktagonal; Oval; Rektangulær; Rund; Sfærisk; Firkantet; Stjerne; Trekantet; V-formet; Annet
zh-TW: 噴頭形狀: 耶誕樹; 雲; 圓錐型; 立方體; 圓柱; 心; 六角形; 八角形; 橢圓形; 長方形; 圓頭; 球形; 方頭; 星星; 三角形; V 型; 其他
pt-BR: Formato do aspersor: Árvore de Natal; Nuvem; Cônico; Cubo; Cilindro; Coração; Hexagonal; Octogonal; Oval; Retangular; Redondo; Esférico; Quadrado; Estrela; Triangular; Em forma de V; Outro